Florida, session 2026, SB1542.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 39 40 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 41 20.60, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 42 20.60âDepartment of Commerce; creation; powers and duties.â 43 (3)(a)âThe following divisions and offices of the 44 Department of Commerce are established: 45 1.âThe Division of Economic Development. 46 2.âThe Division of Community Development. 47 3.âThe Division of Workforce Services. 48 4.âThe Division of Finance and Administration. 49 5.âThe Division of Information Technology. 50 6.âThe Office of the Secretary. 51 7.âThe Office of Economic Accountability and Transparency, 52 which shall: 53 a.âOversee the departmentâs critical objectives as 54 determined by the secretary and make sure that the departmentâs 55 key objectives are clearly communicated to the public. 56 b.âOrganize department resources, expertise, data, and 57 research to focus on and solve the complex economic challenges 58 facing the state. 59 c.âProvide leadership for the departmentâs priority issues 60 that require integration of policy, management, and critical 61 objectives from multiple programs and organizations internal and 62 external to the department; and organize and manage external 63 communication on such priority issues. 64 d.âPromote and facilitate key department initiatives to 65 address priority economic issues and explore data and identify 66 opportunities for innovative approaches to address such economic 67 issues. 68 e.âPromote strategic planning for the department. 69 f.âAdminister and enforce the E-Verify system and 70 employment authorization compliance as set forth in ss. 448.09 71 and 448.095. 72 Section 2.âPresent subsection (5) of section 448.09, 73 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (8), new 74 subsections (5), (6), and (7) are added to that section, and 75 subsections (3) and (4) of that section are amended, to read: 76 448.09âUnauthorized aliens; employment prohibited.â 77 (3)âFor an employer that violates this section, the 78 department shall suspend or revoke all licenses issued by a 79 licensing agency pursuant to chapter 120 for 1 year and impose a 80 fine not to exceed $10,000. Fines must be deposited in the 81 Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund For a violation of this 82 section, the department shall place the employer on probation 83 for a 1-year period and require that the employer report 84 quarterly to the department to demonstrate compliance with the 85 requirements of subsection (1) and s. 448.095. 86 (4)âFor an employer that violates this section a second 87 time, the department shall suspend or revoke all licenses issued 88 by a licensing agency pursuant to chapter 120 for 5 years and 89 impose a fine not to exceed $50,000. Fines must be deposited in 90 the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund Any violation of this 91 section which takes place within 24 months after a previous 92 violation constitutes grounds for the suspension or revocation 93 of all licenses issued by a licensing agency subject to chapter 94 120. The department shall take the following actions for a 95 violation involving: 96 (a)âOne to ten unauthorized aliens, suspension of all 97 applicable licenses held by a private employer for up to 30 days 98 by the respective agencies that issued them. 99 (b)âEleven to fifty unauthorized aliens, suspension of all 100 applicable licenses held by a private employer for up to 60 days 101 by the respective agencies that issued them. 102 (c)âMore than fifty unauthorized aliens, revocation of all 103 applicable licenses held by a private employer by the respective 104 agencies that issued them. 105 (5)âFor an employer that violates this section a third 106 time, the department shall permanently revoke all licenses 107 issued by a licensing agency pursuant to chapter 120 and impose 108 a fine not to exceed $250,000. Fines must be deposited in the 109 Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. 110 (6)âIf, for an employer that violates this section, an 111 unauthorized alien employeeâs actions result in injuries to 112 another person, the department shall suspend or revoke all 113 licenses issued by a licensing agency pursuant to chapter 120 114 for 5 years and impose a fine not to exceed $100,000. Fines must 115 be deposited in the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. 116 (7)âIf, for an employer that violates this section, an 117 unauthorized alien employeeâs actions result in the death of 118 another person, the department must permanently revoke all 119 licenses issued by a licensing agency pursuant to chapter 120 120 and impose a fine not to exceed $500,000. Fines must be 121 deposited in the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. 122 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1), paragraph (b) 123 of subsection (2), paragraph (c) of subsection (5), and 124 subsection (6) of section 448.095, Florida Statutes, are amended 125 to read: 126 448.095âEmployment eligibility.â 127 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 128 (b)ââEmployeeâ means an individual filling a permanent 129 position who performs labor or services under the control or 130 direction of an employer that has the power or right to control 131 and direct the employee in the material details of how the work 132 is to be performed in exchange for salary, wages, or other 133 remuneration. The term also includes labor that is occasional, 134 incidental, or irregular and that exceeds 40 person-hours in 135 total duration. As used in this subsection, the term âdurationâ 136 means the period of time from the commencement to the completion 137 of the particular job or project. An individual hired for casual 138 labor, as defined in s. 443.036, which is to be performed 139 entirely within a private residence, is not an employee of an 140 occupant or owner of the a private residence. An independent 141 contractor, as defined in federal laws or regulations, hired to 142 perform a specified portion of labor or services is not an 143 employee. For the purposes of this section, an individual who 144 receives a Form 1099 from his or her employer is an employee. 145 (2)âEMPLOYMENT VERIFICATION.â 146 (b)1.âA public agency shall use the E-Verify system to 147 verify a new employeeâs employment eligibility as required under 148 paragraph (a). 149 2.âBeginning on July 1, 2026 2023, all a private employers 150 employer with 25 or more employees shall use the E-Verify system 151 to verify a new employeeâs employment eligibility as required 152 under paragraph (a). 153 3.âEach employer shall required to use the E-Verify system 154 under this paragraph must certify on its first return each 155 calendar year to the tax service provider that it is in 156 compliance with this section when making contributions to or 157 reimbursing the stateâs unemployment compensation or 158 reemployment assistance system. An employer that voluntarily 159 uses the E-Verify system may also make such a certification on 160 its first return each calendar year in order to document such 161 use. 162 (5)âPUBLIC AGENCY CONTRACTING.â 163 (c)1.âA public agency, contractor, or subcontractor who has 164 a good faith belief that a person or an entity with which it is 165 contracting has knowingly violated s. 448.09(1) shall terminate 166 the contract with the person or entity. 167 2.âA public agency that has a good faith belief that a 168 subcontractor knowingly violated this subsection, but the 169 contractor otherwise complied with this subsection, shall 170 promptly notify the contractor and order the contractor to 171 immediately terminate the contract with the subcontractor. 172 3.âA contract terminated under this paragraph is not a 173 breach of contract and may not be considered as such. If a 174 public agency terminates a contract with a contractor under this 175 paragraph, the contractor may not be awarded any public contract 176 in the future with any public agency in this state a public 177 contract for at least 1 year after the date on which the 178 contract was terminated. A contractor is liable for any 179 additional costs incurred by a public agency as a result of the 180 termination of a contract. 181 (6)âCOMPLIANCE.â 182 (a)âIn addition to the requirements under s. 288.061(6), 183 beginning on July 1, 2024, for public agencies or beginning on 184 July 1, 2026, for private employers, if the Department of 185 Commerce determines that an employer failed to use the E-Verify 186 system to verify the employment eligibility of employees as 187 required under this section, the department must notify the 188 employer of the departmentâs determination of noncompliance and 189 provide the employer with 30 days to cure the noncompliance. 190 (b)âIf the Department of Commerce determines that an 191 employer failed to use the E-Verify system as required under 192 this section three times in any 24-month period, the department 193 must impose a fine of $1,000 per day until the employer provides 194 sufficient proof to the department that the noncompliance is 195 cured. Continued noncompliance constitutes grounds for the 196 suspension of all licenses issued by a licensing agency subject 197 to chapter 120 until the noncompliance is cured. 198 (c)âFines collected under this subsection must be deposited 199 into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund State Economic 200 Enhancement and Development Trust Fund for use by the department 201 for employer outreach and public notice of the stateâs 202 employment verification laws. 203 Section 4.âPresent paragraphs (a) through (f) of subsection 204 (2) of section 908.104, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 205 paragraphs (b) through (g), respectively, and a new paragraph 206 (a) is added to that subsection, to read: 207 908.104âCooperation with federal immigration authorities.â 208 (2)âExcept as otherwise expressly prohibited by federal 209 law, a state entity, local governmental entity, or law 210 enforcement agency, or an employee, an agent, or a 211 representative of the entity or agency, may not prohibit or in 212 any way restrict a law enforcement agency from taking any of the 213 following actions with respect to information regarding a 214 personâs immigration status: 215 (a)âUsing the E-Verify system to investigate a detained 216 personâs immigration status. 217 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 218 made by this act to section 448.095, Florida Statutes, in a 219 reference thereto, paragraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 220 163.3162, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 221 163.3162âAgricultural lands and practices.â 222 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 223 (g)ââLegally verified agricultural workerâ means a person 224 who: 225 1.âIs lawfully present in the United States; 226 2.âMeets the definition of eligible worker pursuant to 29 227 C.F.R. s. 502.10; 228 3.âHas been verified through the process provided in s. 229 448.095(2) and is authorized to work at the time of employment; 230 4.âIs seasonally or annually employed in bona fide 231 agricultural production; 232 5.âRemains lawfully present and authorized to work 233 throughout the duration of that employment; and 234 6.âIs not an unauthorized alien as defined in s. 235 448.095(1). 236 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.